Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1915
Director of Agriculture; cooperate with United States Department of Agriculture.

The director is hereby authorized to cooperate with the United States Department of Agriculture for the exchange and cross certification of employees or inspectors to implement the Nebraska Meat and Poultry Inspection Law.

Laws 1969, c. 449, § 15, p. 1520;

Laws 2021, LB324, § 9.